Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 4. Disposition of Certain Vehicle and Traffic Offenses.

Sec. 28.05.151.
Citations for scheduled vehicle and traffic offenses.

The supreme court shall determine by rule or order those motor vehicle and traffic offenses, except for offenses subject to a scheduled municipal fine, that are amenable to disposition without court appearance and shall establish a scheduled amount of bail, not to exceed fines prescribed by law, for each offense. A municipality shall determine by ordinance the municipal motor vehicle and traffic offenses that may be disposed of without court appearance and shall establish a fine schedule for each offense.

The supreme court shall establish a scheduled amount of bail allowing disposition of a citation for a violation of AS

28.05.095

and AS

28.35.161

that is punishable as a violation without court appearance.

The supreme court shall require as a condition of the disposition of an offense without appearance that a person charged with any offense for which a bail forfeiture amount has been adopted shall pay the surcharge prescribed in AS

12.55.039

in addition to the bail forfeiture amount established by the supreme court. The surcharge required to be paid under this subsection shall be deposited into the general fund and accounted for under AS

37.05.142

.

The supreme court, in establishing scheduled amounts of bail under this section, and each municipality that establishes or has established a fine schedule under this section shall provide that the scheduled amount of bail or fine, as applicable, for a motor vehicle or traffic offense that is committed in a highway work zone or traffic safety corridor shall be double the amount of the bail or fine for the offense if it had not been committed in a highway work zone or traffic safety corridor.

The supreme court, in establishing scheduled amounts of bail under this section, and each municipality that establishes or has established a fine schedule under this section may not allow for the disposition of an offense without court appearance for a person who is cited for violation of the traffic laws in connection with a motor vehicle accident if the accident resulted in the death of a person. In this subsection, “traffic laws” has the meaning given in AS

28.15.261

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 8 ch 76 SLA 1987; am § 4 ch 98 SLA 1990; am § 5 ch 119 SLA 1994; am § 6 ch 56 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 64 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 89 SLA 2003; am § 2 ch 45 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For the effect of subsection (e) on Rules 43 and 43.1, Alaska Rules of Administration, see § 3, ch. 89, SLA 2003, in the 2003 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 1, 2016, in (b), inserted “and AS

28.35.161

that is punishable as a violation” preceding “without court appearance.”

Sec. 28.05.155.
Court and collection costs.

If a person’s permanent fund dividend is attached to pay the bail or fine for an offense involving a moving motor vehicle, the court shall increase the bail or fine of that person by at least

$25 for court costs; and

$10 for collection costs.

History.

(§ 4 ch 47 SLA 1996)